Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1893XS (2) 91 sb/js S.F. 271 Section 1. Section 34A.3, subsection 1, paragraph a, 1 subparagraphs (1) and (2), Code 2025, are amended to read as 2 follows: 3 (1) Each political subdivision of the state located within 4 the county and having a public safety agency serving territory 5 within the county and each local emergency management agency 6 as defined in section 29C.2 operating within the area is 7 entitled to voting membership on the joint 911 service board. 8 For the purposes of this section , a township that operates a 9 volunteer fire department providing fire protection services 10 to the township, or a city which that provides fire protection 11 services through the operation of a volunteer fire department 12 not financed through city government, shall be considered a 13 political subdivision of the state having a public safety 14 agency serving territory within the county. Each private 15 safety agency operating within the area and each political 16 subdivision of the state not located within the county, but 17 having a public safety agency operating within the area, is 18 entitled to nonvoting membership on the board. 19 (2) A township that does not operate its own public safety 20 agency, but contracts for the provision of public safety 21 services, is not entitled to membership on the joint 911 22 service board, but its contractor is entitled to membership 23 according to the contractorâs status as a public or private 24 safety agency and whether the contractor is located within the 25 county . 26